Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 646A.115 is amended to read:
646A.115. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Admission ticket” means evidence of a purchaser’s right of entry to a venue other than a
commercial motion picture theater or an entertainment event  other than a  movie shown at a
commercial motion picture theater .
[(b)] (b)(A) “Entertainment  event” means a performance, recreation, amusement, diversion,
spectacle, show or similar event  that occurs in  this state  including, but not limited to, a theatrical
or musical performance, concert, film, game, ride or sporting event.
(B) “Entertainment event” does not include a trade show.
(c) “Initial sale” means a ticket seller’s first sale of an admission ticket to a purchaser.
[(c)] (d) “Operator” means a person that owns, operates or controls a venue or that  produces
or promotes an entertainment event, or the person’s agent or employee.
(e) “Presale” means a sale of admission tickets to a  selected group of purchasers with
the permission of  the ticket seller before admission tickets become available for purchase
to the general public.
(f) “Promoter” means  a person that organizes financing or publicity for an entertainment
event, or the person’s agent or employee.
(g) “Purchaser” means an individual who purchases an  admission ticket as admission to
an entertainment event.
[(d)] (h) “Resale” means a sale other than a ticket seller or  an  operator’s initial sale of an
admission ticket for a venue that is located in  or an entertainment event that occurs in this state,
irrespective of the  location in which the sale occurs or the means by which a reseller solicits or
advertises the sale or delivers or receives payment for the admission ticket.
[(e)] (i) “Reseller” means a person other than a ticket seller or  an operator  that conducts a
resale, or the person’s agent or employee .
Enrolled House Bill 3167 (HB 3167-B) Page 1
(j) “Ticket seller” means a person, including but not limited to an  operator or promoter,
that makes an admission ticket available for presale or an initial sale  to a purchaser or re-
seller, or the person’s agent or employee.
(k) “Venue” means a location in which an  entertainment event occurs, entry to which
requires an admission ticket.
(2)(a) A person may not [ intentionally] willfully sell or use software, the purpose of which is  to
circumvent, thwart, interfere with or evade a control or measure,  including a security measure or
an access control system, that an operator , ticket seller  or reseller establishes or uses to ensure
an equitable distribution,  sale or resale of admission tickets for an entertainment event , including
a public or private presale of admission  tickets, or to limit the number of admission tickets
a single purchaser may purchase from a ticket seller or reseller .
(b) A person may not willfully sell or  offer to sell an admission ticket that the person
obtained using software described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(3)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a  person may not, without
prior written authorization, willfully:
(A) Use or cause another person to use an Internet domain name  or subdomain name if
the domain name or subdomain name:
(i) Names the venue;
(ii) Names the entertainment event  or an individual or entity that is scheduled to appear
or perform at the entertainment event; or
(iii) Is substantially similar to  the name of the venue, of the entertainment event or of
a person or entity that is scheduled to appear or perform at the entertainment event; or
(B) Publish or cause another person to publish a website that has or uses:
(i) Text, images, graphics, a design or other material that individually or in  combination
is so substantially similar  to the intellectual property of an operator or venue as to mislead
a reasonable visitor to the website into believing that the website is affiliated with the op-
erator or venue; or
(ii) Text, images, graphics or a design that states or  implies, including by use of the word
“official,”  that  the website is affiliated with or endorsed by an operator or venue or an indi-
vidual or entity that is scheduled to appear or perform at an entertainment event.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection does not apply to a person that is  licensed to use an
image of, or is otherwise authorized to act on behalf of:
(A) A venue, a promoter or another person that is scheduled to  appear or perform at an
entertainment event; or
(B) A promoter or sponsor of:
(i) The entertainment event; or
(ii) A person that is scheduled to appear or perform at the entertainment event.
(c) A seating chart of a venue or  a picture of a view from a seat in a venue does not
constitute text, images, graphics or a design that a person may not publish or cause  another
person to publish under paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection.
[(3)] (4) Violation of [ subsection (2) of ] this section is an unlawful practice under ORS  646.608
that is subject to an action under ORS 646.632 and 646.638.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 646A.115 by section 1  of this 2025 Act apply to sales
of or offers to sell an admission ticket that occur on or after January 1, 2026.
Enrolled House Bill 3167 (HB 3167-B) Page 2
Passed by House April 21, 2025
Repassed by House June 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 11, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3167 (HB 3167-B) Page 3